Tennessee, session 114, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-201, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary:
(1) Elections for county boards of education must be held at the same
time and on the same election cycle as elections for members of the local
legislative body for the county;
(2) Members of county boards of education must have the same
staggered terms as members of the local legislative body for the county; and
(3) Members of a county board of education must have the same term
limits as members of the local legislative body for the county.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1383
003026
- 1 -